Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-314. Disclosure of information.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, information obtained by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services from any employing unit or individual pursuant to the administration of this chapter and any determination as to the rights or status of any employer or individual made by the director pursuant to the administration of this chapter shall be held confidential and shall be protected by government privilege.

The information shall not be used in any action or proceeding before any court, administrative tribunal, or body except those created by this chapter unless the Division of Workforce Services is a party, a real party in interest, or a complainant therein or unless the litigation involves criminal actions brought under provisions of this chapter.

This information shall not be otherwise disclosed or be open to public inspection in any manner revealing the individual's or employing unit's identity.

Information from the records of the Division of Workforce Services that concerns a claim for benefits shall be available for inspection and copying by any interested party or his or her legal representative to the extent necessary for the proper representation of his or her position in any proceeding under this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other law:

Any claimant may be supplied, subject to such restrictions as the director may by rule prescribe, with any information contained in his or her unemployment insurance benefit payment record or on his or her most recent monetary determination;

Any individual or employer may be provided any information from the records of the Division of Workforce Services to the extent that the information was provided by him or her; and

Any job applicant may be provided with evidence of his or her registration for work.

Subject to such restrictions as the director may by rule prescribe, the confidential information may be made available to any agency of this or any other state, or any federal agency, charged with the administration of an unemployment compensation law or the maintenance of a system of public employment offices, the Internal Revenue Service, the Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs, the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, or any state or federal agency for income or eligibility verification purposes but except as may otherwise be provided in this section and § 11-10-305 [repealed], §§ 11-10-306 — 11-10-312 and 11-10-315 — 11-10-318 only as and to the extent mandated by Pub. L. No. 98-369 and implementing regulations promulgated thereunder by the United States Department of Labor.

The information obtained in connection with the administration of the employment service may be made available to persons or agencies for purposes appropriate to the operation of a public employment service.

Upon request, the director shall furnish to any agency of the United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance through public employment and may furnish to any state agency similarly charged, the name, address, ordinary occupation, and employment status of each recipient of benefits and the recipient's rights to further benefits under this chapter.

The director may request the United States Comptroller of the Currency to cause an examination of the correctness of any return or report of any national banking association rendered pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and may in connection with this request transmit any report or return to the United States Comptroller of the Currency as provided in section 1606(c) [repealed] of the Internal Revenue Code of 1939.

Upon request of a public agency administering or supervising the administration of a state plan of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families approved under Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act, or the administration of a state plan of medical assistance approved under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, the administration of a state plan of food stamps approved under the Food Stamp Act of 1977, Pub. L. No. 95-113, request of a public agency charged with any duty or responsibility authorized or required under the Child Support and Establishment of Paternity Program provisions of Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, or request of officers or employees of the United States Department of Agriculture, the director shall furnish to the public agency information contained in the files of the Division of Workforce Services with respect to any individual specified in the request as to whether the individual is receiving, has received, or has made application for unemployment compensation, the date the individual was determined eligible or ineligible, the date the individual's claim was exhausted, the weekly benefit amount actually paid and the date paid, the individual's weekly benefit amount, whether the individual is receiving or has received wages, the name and address of the employer from whom the wages have been received and the amount of any wages received by the individual, the current or most recent home address of the individual, whether the individual has refused an offer of employment, and, if so, a description of the employment so offered, including, but not limited to, the terms, conditions, and rate of pay therefor.

The requesting agency shall reimburse the Division of Workforce Services for costs incurred in providing the requested information.

The director shall promulgate rules establishing such safeguards as are necessary to ensure that information disclosed as authorized in this section to state and local child support enforcement agency officers and employees is used only for purposes of establishing and collecting child support obligations from and locating individuals owing the obligations and to ensure that information disclosed as authorized in this section to officers and employees of the United States Department of Agriculture and to officers and employees of any state food stamp agency is used only for purposes of determining an individual's eligibility for benefits or the amount of benefits under the food stamp program established under the Food Stamp Act of 1977.

Information requested by the Department of Human Services and the Department of Finance and Administration under this subsection shall be released to the appropriate divisions of the respective departments on a basis in accordance with a plan to be developed between the appropriate division of each department and the Division of Workforce Services.

In addition to the above, wage information contained in the records of the Division of Workforce Services shall be made available to the extent necessary for purposes of determining an individual's eligibility for aid or services or the amount of the aid or services to which an individual may be entitled under a state plan for aid and services to needy families with children approved under Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act to a state or political subdivision thereof charged with the responsibility of making the determinations when the information is specifically requested on an individual by name and Social Security number by the state or political subdivision for those purposes.

The governmental agency or entity requesting any information under this subsection shall reimburse the Division of Workforce Services for any and all costs incurred by the agency in making the requested information available.

Officers or employees of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and representatives of a public housing agency shall be entitled to certain wage and unemployment compensation information with respect to individuals applying for or participating in any housing assistance program administered by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development as provided for in section 303 of the Social Security Act at 42 U.S.C. § 503 but only as and to the extent mandated by Section 904(c) of Pub. L. No. 100-628, the McKinney Homeless Act, and implementing regulations.

All requests received by the director under this subsection shall be processed within three (3) business days.

The requesting agency shall reimburse the Division of Workforce Services for the costs incurred in providing the requested information.

All records, files, and documents of the Division of Workforce Services pertaining to claims, benefit payments, assessments, contributions, disqualifications for benefits, removals of disqualifications for benefits, charges and credits to accounts, and classification of employers, wherever located, which relate in any way to an employer or an employee of the employer shall be made available at all times for examination by an affected employer, a claimant, or the duly authorized representative of an employer or a claimant.

But no record, file, or document shall be removed from the custody of the Division of Workforce Services.

Any information made available under this provision to a claimant shall be information pertaining only to that claimant.

Any information made available under this provision to an affected employer shall be information pertaining only to that employer.

No finding of fact or conclusion of law contained in a decision of the Division of Workforce Services, an appeals hearing officer, the Board of Review, or a court obtained under this chapter shall have a preclusive effect in any other action or proceeding except proceedings under this chapter.

To the extent necessary for the proper verification of transactions affecting his or her account as provided in §§ 11-10-701 — 11-10-715, upon receipt by the director of a request from an affected employer for information concerning benefits paid to a claimant who has been a base period employee of the employer, the director shall, as promptly as possible, furnish information regarding the periods of time for which benefits were paid and the amount of benefits chargeable to the employer that have been paid to the claimant up to the date of the employer's request for each worker the employer properly identifies in his or her request by Social Security account number and name.

However, information regarding benefits charged more than one (1) year prior to the last computation date may not be given.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, information obtained in the administration of this chapter and in the administration of and concerning programs under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, Pub. L. No. 113-128, programs by the Division of Workforce Services shall be made available to persons and agencies for purposes appropriate to the Division of Workforce Services' operation and administration of programs under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, Pub. L. No. 113-128.

Under an agreement between the Division of Workforce Services and the appropriate agencies, the director shall establish safeguards as are necessary to protect the confidential information made available pursuant to this section.

Upon receipt of a subpoena of a Workers' Compensation Commission administrative law judge by the director, information from an individual's claim record or from his or her application for work may be made available to the Workers' Compensation Commission for use in making administrative determinations under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq., in court proceedings under that law, or in other actions reasonably necessary for the proper administration of the law.

Photocopies of Division of Workforce Services records containing the information shall be received in evidence in any court or administrative proceeding had under the law provided that the copies have been sealed with the official seal of the director.

The director shall not be obligated to make the information available unless:

The subpoena is delivered at least five (5) work days prior to the date the information is required; and

Payment of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the cost of producing the information is made or tendered at the time of service of the order or within three (3) working days of service of the order.

For use in furthering the economic development of the State of Arkansas, the director may provide, to the extent that it is available, the following information obtained in the administration of this chapter to the state agencies specified:

The Arkansas Economic Development Council and the Arkansas Economic Development Commission may be provided:

The employer's name, mailing address, and business location in Arkansas, the name of the owner, chief executive officer, or plant manager, the current number of employees, and the code for each employer classified by the agency in Standard Industrial Classification Codes 20-87 or the equivalent classification codes under the North American Industry Classification System; and

The claims status of workers hired by employers under the Arkansas Economic Development Council's Arkansas Enterprise Zone Program authorized by the Arkansas Enterprise Zone Act of 1993, § 15-4-1701 et seq., and the Arkansas Economic Development Act of 1995, § 15-4-1901 et seq., provided that either the Arkansas Economic Development Council or the Arkansas Economic Development Commission submits a list of workers by name and Social Security number;

The Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration may be provided:

Such information as is required and necessary by the Arkansas Enterprise Zone Act of 1993, § 15-4-1701 et seq., and the Arkansas Economic Development Act of 1995, § 15-4-1901 et seq.;

The net increase in employment at manufacturing and mining establishments as defined in § 26-51-505 that are participating in the manufacturing jobs tax credit program created by § 26-51-505 if the Revenue Division provides a list of employers by name, location, and the period of time for which the data is sought; and

Such information as is necessary for the effective operation of their respective programs to allow cooperation between the Revenue Division and the Division of Workforce Services;

The Arkansas Institute for Economic Advancement of the University of Arkansas at Little Rock may be provided covered wage and employment data by county on a quarterly basis by the two-digit United States Office of Management and Budget standard industrial classifications or the equivalent classification codes under the North American Industry Classification System;

Arkansas Rehabilitation Services may be provided employer quarterly wage reports and employer names, addresses, and phone numbers;

The Arkansas Department of Transportation may be provided:

The employer's name, the business location in Arkansas, the current number of employees, and the code for each employer classified by the agency in the Standard Industrial Classification Code or the equivalent classification code under the North American Industry Classification System; and

Other information that is necessary for the effective operation of their respective programs in order to allow cooperation between the Arkansas Department of Transportation and the Division of Workforce Services; and

The Division of Environmental Quality may be provided the employer's name, mailing address, business location in Arkansas, the current number of employees, and the code for each employer classified by the agency in the Standard Industrial Classification Code or an equivalent classification code under the North American Industry Classification System.

The state entities specified in subsection (j) of this section are strictly prohibited from making any disclosure or redisclosure of the confidential information which may be made available to them under the provisions of subsection (j) of this section.

Any publication of employer data by these entities shall be done in strict accordance with the rules used by the agency and as prescribed by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics to prevent the disclosure of individual employer information.

The governmental agency or entity requesting any information under subsection (j) of this section shall reimburse the Division of Workforce Services for any and all costs incurred by the agency in making the requested information available.

Information requested by the state entities specified in subsection (j) of this section shall be released to the appropriate entities in accordance with agreements between these entities and the Division of Workforce Services.

Upon receipt of an order from a court of record of this state by the director for information pertaining to an individual's current wage file and unemployment benefit payment record as contained in the records of the Division of Workforce Services, the information shall be made available to the court for the purpose of determining an amount of support to be set during a proceeding for the establishment or collection of child support obligations, or both.

A photocopy of the records containing the information or a statement that no information for the requested individual is contained in the file of the Division of Workforce Services under the official seal of the director shall be received into evidence in the court of record.

The court order shall be satisfied by mailing the document under seal directly to the court of record within ten (10) working days of receipt of the court order unless a motion challenging the information is filed or a subpoena is issued requiring the appearance of an employee of the Division of Workforce Services with the court within thirty (30) days prior to the trial.

The director shall comply with the court order for information if the following conditions are met:

The order is delivered at least ten (10) workdays prior to the date that the information is required;

The court order includes the name and Social Security number of the individual for whom information is requested; and

The court order is accompanied by the payment of ten dollars ($10.00) by the moving party seeking the information to the Division of Workforce Services for costs associated with producing the information.

Provided, however, the Division of Workforce Services may not release information under this subsection if the United States Secretary of Labor rules that release of the information would be grounds to find that the state is in substantial noncompliance with 42 U.S.C. § 503 or 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

Beginning on and after January 1, 1995, the State Insurance Department may be provided with the name and address of any lessor employing unit as defined in § 11-10-717(e).

The State Insurance Department shall be strictly prohibited from making any disclosure or redisclosure of any record containing confidential information provided by the Division of Workforce Services under this subsection.

The Workers' Health and Safety Division may be furnished, for production of the extra-hazardous employer identification formula, the following data to the extent that such data is maintained in the Division of Workforce Services’ computer database:

Employer name;

Federal employer identification number;

Employer address and plant locations in Arkansas;

Employer telephone number;

Employer standard industrial classification code;

Maximum number of employees by calendar year;

Unemployment insurance account number; and

Reporting unit number.

The Workers' Health and Safety Division shall be strictly prohibited from making any disclosure or redisclosure of the confidential information which may be made available to it under this subsection.

Additionally, the Workers' Health and Safety Division shall reimburse the Division of Workforce Services for any and all costs incurred by the Division of Workforce Services in making the information available.

Effective July 1, 1997, the director may provide information or take other actions necessitated by the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-193.

The director may furnish wage and claim information to the state and national New Hire Directories created by Pub. L. No. 104-193 for the purposes of locating individuals to establish paternity and to establish, modify, or enforce child support orders. The director may authorize state and local child support enforcement agencies to disclose unemployment compensation data to an agent and may permit state and local child support enforcement agencies to access such data for establishing paternity and other purposes.

Information requested pursuant to Pub. L. No. 104-193 shall only be released in accordance with an agreement between the Division of Workforce Services and the appropriate state or federal agency. Safeguards protecting the confidentiality of such data and reimbursement of costs for providing such information will be made part of the agreement.

The State Department for Social Security Administration Disability Determination may be provided employee wage files and unemployment claim records for the purpose of investigations for potential fraud. The State Department for Social Security Administration Disability Determination is strictly prohibited from making any disclosure or redisclosure of the confidential information which may be made available to it under this subsection. Reasonable costs will be required for producing this information.

The Workers' Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit may be furnished pursuant to a subpoena any individual's wage file and unemployment benefit payment record as contained in the records of the Division of Workforce Services. These records are being provided for the sole purpose of investigating potential workers' compensation fraud. The Workers' Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit is strictly prohibited from making any disclosure or redisclosure of the confidential information which may be made available to it under the provisions of this subsection. However, records provided to the Workers' Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit pursuant to this subsection may be made part of a Workers' Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit referral for criminal charges to a local prosecutor under § 11-9-106(d)(3) and used in any resulting criminal trial or prosecution, including cases tried by employees of the Workers' Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit under the provisions of § 11-9-106(e)(2). Reasonable costs may be required for producing the subpoenaed information.

The director, pursuant to a valid subpoena issued by a state prosecuting attorney, the Attorney General, a United States Attorney, a United States Magistrate Judge, or the Federal Bureau of Investigation, may release information in the possession of the Division of Workforce Services to law enforcement officials who seek unemployment information for the investigation or prosecution of a crime or to enforce an order of a court in a criminal matter.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the Division of Workforce Services from providing information subpoenaed by the Attorney General in any case.

The director may release information in the possession of the Division of Workforce Services to federal public officials in the performance of their official duties acting through the United States Attorney's office.

The information will be disclosed under an information exchange agreement with the United States Attorney's office, which will ensure the protection of the confidentiality of the information and the cost of providing the information.

In cases except as provided in subdivision (r)(1) of this section, the director shall:

First move to quash the subpoena; and

Honor the subpoena and subpoenas dealing with similar subject matter, but only if a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the need to examine the subpoenaed information outweighs the express policy of maintaining confidentiality in matters involving individuals and employers dealing with the Division of Workforce Services.

To perform audit and compliance duties, the Department of Finance and Administration may be provided unemployment insurance contribution information reported by companies doing business in Arkansas, including without limitation employer name, employer address, employer telephone number, federal employer identification number, and tax identification number of employees.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall not make any disclosure or redisclosure of the confidential information provided under subdivision (s)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1949, No. 155, § 13; 1977, No. 226, § 1; 1977, No. 376, § 15; 1981, No. 43, § 16; 1983, No. 482, § 32; 1985, No. 8, §§ 17-21; 1985, No. 9, §§ 17-21; 1985, No. 293, § 1; 1985, No. 923, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 19; 1989, No. 420, §§ 3, 4; 1991, No. 100, §§ 17-21; 1991, No. 869, § 1; 1993, No. 6, § 4; 1995, No. 519, §§ 3, 4; 1997, No. 234, §§ 7-11; 1997, No. 540, § 14; 1999, No. 1116, §§ 6-8; 2001, No. 1367, §§ 1, 2; 2001, No. 1467, § 2; 2001, No. 1477, § 1; 2003, No. 1223, § 3; 2003, No. 1341, §§ 1, 2; 2005, No. 1845, § 2; 2009, No. 273, § 1; 2009, No. 504, § 1; 2015, No. 907, § 1; 2017, No. 707, § 14; 2019, No. 242, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 813-815; 2019, No. 910, §§
201-220.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The reference to Office of Management and Budget in subdivision (j)(3) is an apparent reference to the Office of Management and Budget in the Executive Office of the President. See 31 U.S.C. § 501.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment, in (h), substituted the first occurrence of “programs under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, Pub. L. No. 113-128” for “the Job Training Partnership Act, 29 U.S.C. § 1501 et seq., and its successor, the Workforce Investment Act, Pub. L. No. 105-220” and the second occurrence for “the Job Training Partnership Act and its successor, the Workforce Investment Act, Pub. L. No. 105-220, programs”; inserted the (2) designation; and substituted “Under” for “Pursuant to.”

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in the introductory language of (j)(5) and in (j)(5)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 242 inserted “and the Arkansas Economic Development Commission” in the introductory language of (j)(1); substituted “either the Arkansas Economic Development Council or the Arkansas Economic Development Commission” for “the commission” in (j)(1)((B); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b)(2)(A) and (c)(1)(A); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (e)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1); substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” throughout the section; substituted “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families” for “Aid to Families with Dependent Children” in (e)(1)(A); substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (j)(6); in the introductory language of (n)(1), deleted “Beginning on and after January 1, 1995” at the beginning; and made stylistic changes.

U.S. Code.

Section 1606(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1939 referred to in this section has been repealed. For present law, see 26 U.S.C. § 3305. Part A and Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act are codified as 42 U.S.C. §§ 601 et seq. and 651 et seq., respectively. Public Law 98-369 is primarily codified throughout titles 26, 38, 41, and 42 of the U.S. Code. Title XIX of the Social Security Act is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. The Food Stamp Act of 1964 and the Food Stamp Act of 1977 are both codified as 7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq. The Job Training Partnership Act is primarily codified as 29 U.S.C. § 1501 et seq. [repealed]. The Stewart B. McKinney Homeless Assistance Act, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 11301 et seq.

The Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104-193, referred to in this section, is codified as 8 U.S.C. §§ 1612, 1631, 1632, 1641, 1642, and as notes under 8 U.S.C. § 1183a and 42 U.S.C. §§ 601 and 1305.

11-10-315. Authority to administer oaths, issue subpoenas, etc.

In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, the chair of an appeal tribunal, the members of the Board of Review, and any duly authorized representative of any of them shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify to official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records deemed necessary as evidence in connection with disputed claims or the administration of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1943, No. 138, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 221.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-316. Refusal to obey subpoena.

In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any court of this state within the jurisdiction of which the inquiry is carried on or within the jurisdiction of which the person guilty of contumacy or refusal to obey is found or resides or transacts business, upon application by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, the Board of Review, the chair of an appeal tribunal, or any duly authorized representative of any of them shall have jurisdiction to issue to the person an order requiring the person to appear before the director, the board, the chair of an appeal tribunal, or any duly authorized representative of any of them, there to produce evidence if so ordered or there to give testimony touching the matter under investigation or in question, and any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

Any person who shall without just cause fail or refuse to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records, if it is in his or her power to do so, in obedience to a subpoena of the director, the board, the chair of an appeal tribunal, or any duly authorized representative of any of them shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment for not longer than sixty (60) days, or by both fine and imprisonment.

Each day that the violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1943, No. 138, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 222.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-317. Protection against self-incrimination.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records before the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, the Board of Review, the chair of an appeal tribunal, or any duly authorized representative of any of them or in obedience to the subpoena of any of them in any cause or proceeding before the director, the board, or an appeal tribunal on the ground that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him or her may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to a penalty or forfeiture.

However, no individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she is compelled, after having claimed his or her privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, except that the individual so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1943, No. 138, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 223.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-318. Employing unit to keep and report work records.

Each employing unit shall keep true and accurate work records, for such periods of time and containing such information as the Director of the Division of Workforce Services may prescribe.

The records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied by the director or his or her authorized representatives at any reasonable time and as often as may be necessary.

The director, the Board of Review, and the chair of any appeal tribunal may require from any employing unit any sworn or unsworn reports, with respect to persons employed by it, which he or she or the board deems necessary for the effective administration of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 11; 1943, No. 138, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1114; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 224.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1).

11-10-319. Representation in court.

Civil Actions. In any civil action to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, the Board of Review, and the state may be represented by any qualified attorney who is employed by the director and is designated by him or her for this purpose or at the director's request by the Attorney General.

Criminal Actions. All criminal actions for violations of any provisions of this chapter, or any rule issued pursuant thereto, shall be prosecuted by the Attorney General of the state, or by the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 17; 1943, No. 138, § 22; 1963, No. 93, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1120; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 816; 2019, No. 910, §
225.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-320. Employment Security Administration Fund — Creation.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Employment Security Administration Fund”.

All money deposited or paid into the Employment Security Administration Fund shall be continuously available to the Director of the Division of Workforce Services for expenditure in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and shall not lapse at any time or be transferred to any other fund.

The Employment Security Administration Fund shall consist of any money appropriated by this state in accordance with this chapter; all money received from the United States or any agency thereof; all money received from any agency of the United States or any other state as compensation for services or facilities supplied to the agency; all amounts received pursuant to any surety bond or insurance policy or from other sources for losses sustained by the Employment Security Administration Fund or by reason of damage to property, equipment, or supplies purchased from money in the Employment Security Administration Fund; and all proceeds realized from the sale or disposition of any property, equipment, or supplies which may no longer be necessary for the proper administration of this law.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section and §§ 11-10-321 and 11-10-322, all money requisitioned and deposited into the Employment Security Administration Fund pursuant to this chapter shall remain part of the Employment Security Administration Fund and shall be used only in accordance with the conditions specified in this chapter.

The director shall transmit to the Auditor of State all documents and information required by the Auditor of State from which to prepare a register. The Auditor of State is authorized and directed to keep a register in his or her office of all checks and other fiscal transactions of the expenditures from the Employment Security Administration Fund. This information shall be a public record.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 13; 1953, No. 325, § 1; 1959, No. 142, § 2; 1985, No. 8, § 23; 1985, No. 9, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1116; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 226.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (b).

11-10-321. Employment Security Administration Fund — Deposit and disbursement.

All money in the Employment Security Administration Fund shall be deposited, administered, and disbursed in the same manner and under the same conditions and requirements as are provided by law for other special funds in the State Treasury, except that money in the Employment Security Administration Fund shall not be commingled with other state funds but shall be maintained in a separate account on the books of a depository bank.

Disbursements shall be paid out of the Employment Security Administration Fund on requisitions drawn by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services under rules of the director.

All money in the Employment Security Administration Fund, except money received pursuant to the authorization in section 903 of the Social Security Act, shall be expended solely for the purpose and in the amounts found necessary by the United States Secretary of Labor for the proper and efficient administration of the employment security program.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 13; 1953, No. 325, § 1; 1959, No. 142, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1116; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 22; 2019, No. 315, § 817; 2019, No. 910, § 227.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (b).

U.S. Code.

Section 903 of the Social Security Act referred to in this section is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 1103.

11-10-322. Employment Security Administration Fund — Reimbursement of the fund.

If any money in the Employment Security Administration Fund, paid to this state under Title III of the Social Security Act or the Wagner-Peyser Act, is found by the United States Secretary of Labor, because of any action or contingency, to have been lost or to have been expended for purposes other than, or in amounts in excess of, those found necessary by the United States Secretary of Labor for the proper administration of the employment security program, it is the policy of this state that the money shall be replaced by money appropriated for that purpose by the state to the fund for expenditure as provided in this chapter.

Upon receipt of such a finding by the United States Secretary of Labor, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall promptly report the amount required for the replacement to the Governor, and the Governor shall, at the earliest opportunity, submit to the General Assembly a request for the appropriation of that amount.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 13; 1953, No. 325, § 1; 1959, No. 142, § 2; 1985, No. 8, § 24; 1985, No. 9, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1116; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 23; 2019, No. 910, § 228.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (b).

U.S. Code.

Title III of the Social Security Act referred to in this section is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 501 et seq. The Wagner-Peyser Act is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq.